Oklahoma, session 2026, SB545.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4200.4a of Title 59, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Upon the effective date of this act, all powers, duties,


functions, and responsibilities of the State Board of Cosmetology


and Barbering related to the Massage Therapy Practice Act shall


transfer to the Board of Chiropractic Examiners.


B. All records, matters pending, assets, current and future


liabilities, fund balances, encumbrances, obligations, indebtedness,


and legal and contractual rights and responsibilities of the State


Board of Cosmetology and Barbering related to the regulation of the


practice of massage therapy shall transfer to the Board of


Chiropractic Examiners.


Req. No. 22 Page 2


C. Any monies accruing to or in the name of the State Board of


Cosmetology and Barbering on and after the effective date of this


act related to the regulation of the practice of massage therapy, or


any monies that accrue in any funds or accounts or are maintained


for the benefit of the State Board of Cosmetology and Barbering on


and after the effective date of this act related to the regulation


of the practice of massage therapy, shall transfer to the Board of


Chiropractic Examiners.


D. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services shall coordinate the transfer of funds, allotments,


purchase orders, and outstanding financial obligations or


encumbrances as provided for in this section.


E. On the effective date of this act, all administrative rules


promulgated by the State Board of Cosmetology and Barbering under


the Massage Therapy Practice Act shall transfer to and become a part


of the administrative rules of the Board of Chiropractic Examiners.


The Office of Administrative Rules in the Office of the Secretary of


State shall provide adequate notice in “The Oklahoma Register” of


the transfer of such rules and shall place the transferred rules


under the Oklahoma Administrative Code title of the Board of


Chiropractic Examiners. Such rules shall continue in force and


effect as rules of the Board of Chiropractic Examiners from and


after the effective date of this act, and any amendment, repeal, or



Req. No. 22 Page 3


addition to the transferred rules shall be under the jurisdiction of


the Board of Chiropractic Examiners.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 4200.2, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 4200.2. As used in the Massage Therapy Practice Act:


1. “Board” means the State Board of Cosmetology and Barbering


Board of Chiropractic Examiners;


2. “Direct access” means the ability that the public has to


seek out treatment by a massage therapist without the direct


referral from a medical or health care professional;


3. “Massage therapist” means an individual who practices


massage or massage therapy and is licensed under the Massage Therapy


Practice Act. A massage therapist uses visual, kinesthetic, and


palpatory skills to assess the body and may evaluate a condition to


the extent of determining whether massage is indicated or


contraindicated;


4. “Massage therapy” means the skillful treatment of the soft


tissues of the human body. Massage is designed to promote general


relaxation, improve movement, relieve somatic and muscular pain or


dysfunction, stress and muscle tension, provide for general health


enhancement, personal growth, education and the organization,


balance and integration of the human body and includes, but is not


limited to:



Req. No. 22 Page 4


a. the use of touch, pressure, friction, stroking,


gliding, percussion, kneading, movement, positioning,


holding, range of motion and nonspecific stretching


within the normal anatomical range of movement, and


vibration by manual or mechanical means with or


without the use of massage devices that mimic or


enhance manual measures, and


b. the external application of ice, heat and cold packs


for thermal therapy, water, lubricants, abrasives and


external application of herbal or topical preparations


not classified as prescription drugs; and


5. “Massage therapy establishment” means a place of business


where a licensed massage therapist provides massage therapy services


to clients in exchange for payment. Massage therapy establishment


does not include the home of a client; and


6. “Massage therapy school” means a facility providing


instruction in massage therapy.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 4200.3, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 4200.3. A. Unless a person is a licensed massage


therapist, a person shall not:


1. Use the title of massage therapist;


2. Represent himself or herself to be a massage therapist;



Req. No. 22 Page 5


3. Use any other title, words, abbreviations, letters, figures,


signs or devices that indicate the person is a massage therapist; or


4. Utilize the terms “massage”, “massage therapy” or “massage


therapist” when advertising or printing promotional material.


B. A person shall not maintain, manage or operate a massage


therapy school offering education, instruction or training in


massage therapy unless the school is a licensed massage therapy


school pursuant to Section 7 of this act Section 4200.7 of this


title.


C. Individuals practicing massage therapy under the Massage


Therapy Practice Act shall not perform any of the following:


1. Diagnosis of illness or disease;


2. High-velocity, low-amplitude thrust;


3. Electrical stimulation;


4. Application of ultrasound;


5. Use of any technique that interrupts or breaks the skin; or


6. Prescribing of medicines.


D. Nothing in the Massage Therapy Practice Act shall be


construed to prevent:


1. Qualified members of other recognized professions who are


licensed or regulated under Oklahoma law from rendering services


within the scope of the license of the person, provided the person


does not represent himself or herself as a massage therapist. A


physician or other licensed health care provider providing health

Req. No. 22 Page 6


care services within the scope of practice of the physician or


provider shall not be required to be licensed by or registered with


the State Board of Cosmetology and Barbering Board of Chiropractic


Examiners for the purposes of the Massage Therapy Practice Act;


2. Students from rendering massage therapy services within the


course of study when enrolled at a licensed massage therapy school;


3. Visiting massage therapy instructors from another state or


territory of the United States, the District of Columbia or any


foreign nation from teaching massage therapy, provided the


instructor is duly licensed or registered, if required, and is


qualified in the instructor’s place of residence for the practice of


massage therapy;


4. Any nonresident person holding a current license,


registration or certification in massage therapy from another state


or recognized national certification system determined as acceptable


by the Board when temporarily present in this state from providing


massage therapy services as a part of an emergency response team


working in conjunction with disaster relief officials or at special


events such as conventions, sporting events, educational field


trips, conferences, traveling shows or exhibitions;


5. Physicians or other health care professionals from


appropriately referring to duly licensed massage therapists or limit


in any way the right of direct access of the public to licensed


massage therapists; or

Req. No. 22 Page 7


6. The practice of any person in this state who uses touch,


words and directed movement to deepen awareness of existing patterns


of movement in the body as well as to suggest new possibilities of


movement while engaged within the scope of practice of a profession


with established standards and ethics, provided that the services


are not designated or implied to be massage or massage therapy.


Practices shall include but are not limited to the Feldenkrais


Method of somatic education, Rolf Movement Integration by the Rolf


Institute, the Trager Approach of movement education, and Body-Mind


Centering. Practitioners shall be recognized by or meet the


established standards of either a professional organization or


credentialing agency that represents or certifies the respective


practice based on a minimal level of training, demonstration of


competency, and adherence to ethical standards.


E. A physician or other licensed health care provider providing


health care services within their scope of practice shall not be


required to be licensed or registered with the State Board of


Cosmetology Board for the purposes of the Massage Therapy Practice


Act.


SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 4200.4, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 4200.4. A. The State Board of Cosmetology and


Barbering is hereby authorized to adopt and promulgate Board of


Chiropractic Examiners shall have the power and duty to:

Req. No. 22 Page 8


1. Promulgate rules pursuant to the Administrative Procedures


Act that are necessary for the implementation and enforcement of the


Massage Therapy Practice Act, including, but not limited to,


qualifications for licensure, renewals, reinstatements, and


continuing education requirements.;


B. The State Board of Cosmetology and Barbering is hereby


empowered to perform 2. Perform investigations, to require and


order or subpoena the attendance of witnesses, the inspection of


records and premises, and the production of records and other


relevant documents relating to the investigation of matters that may


come before the Board or practices regulated by the Massage Therapy


Practice Act, and to seek injunctive relief;


3. Employ or contract with one or more investigators, as


needed, for the sole purpose of investigating complaints regarding


the conduct of massage therapists, and fix and pay their salaries or


wages. Any investigator shall be certified as a peace officer by


the Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training and shall have


statewide jurisdiction to perform the duties authorized by the


Massage Therapy Practice Act;


4. Require applicants for an original massage therapy license


to submit to a national criminal history record check pursuant to


Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes. The costs


associated with the national criminal history record check shall be


paid directly by the applicant;

Req. No. 22 Page 9


5. Establish appropriate fees and charges to implement the


provisions of the Massage Therapy Practice Act; and


6. Promulgate, by rule, a code of ethics.


C. There is hereby created an Advisory Board Committee on


Massage Therapy. The Advisory Board Committee on Massage Therapy


shall assist the Board in carrying out the provisions of this


section regarding the qualifications, examination, registration,


regulation, and standards of professional conduct of massage


therapists. The Advisory Board Committee on Massage Therapy shall


consist of five (5) members to be appointed by the Governor for


four-year terms as follows:


1. Three members who shall be licensed massage therapists and


have practiced in Oklahoma for not less than three (3) years prior


to their appointment;


2. One member who shall be an administrator or faculty member


of a nationally accredited school of massage therapy; and


3. One who shall be a citizen member.


D. The fee for any license issued between the effective date of


this act and May 1, 2017, shall be Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00).


The fee or renewal fee for any a massage therapy license issued


after May 1, 2017, shall be Fifty Dollars ($50.00) Seventy-five


Dollars ($75.00) per year. A duplicate license fee shall be Ten


Dollars ($10.00).



Req. No. 22 Page 10


SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 4200.5, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 4200.5. A. Between the effective date of this act and


May 1, 2017, the State Board of Cosmetology and Barbering The Board


of Chiropractic Examiners shall issue a license to practice massage


therapy to any person who files a completed application, accompanied


by the required fees, and who submits satisfactory evidence that the


applicant:


1. Is at least eighteen (18) years of age;


2. a. Has one or more of the following, if the applicant


made application for an original license on or before


May 1, 2017:


a. (1) documentation that the applicant has


completed and passed a nationally recognized


competency examination in the practice of massage


therapy,


b. (2) an affidavit of at least five (5) years of


work experience in the state, or


c. (3) a certificate and transcript of completion


from a massage school with at least five hundred


(500) hours of education,


b. Meets both of the following, if the applicant makes


application for an original license after May 1, 2017,


and before July 1, 2027:

Req. No. 22 Page 11


(1) has completed the equivalent of five hundred


(500) hours of formal education in massage


therapy from a state-licensed school, and


(2) has passed a nationally recognized competency


examination approved by the Board, or


c. Meets both of the following, if the applicant makes


application for an original license on or after July


1, 2027:


(1) has completed the equivalent of six hundred (600)


hours of formal education in massage therapy from


a state-licensed school, and


(2) has passed a nationally recognized competency


examination approved by the Board;


3. Provides proof of documentation that the applicant currently


maintains liability insurance for practice as a massage therapist;


and


4. Provides full disclosure to the Board of any criminal


proceeding taken against the applicant including but not limited to


pleading guilty or nolo contendere to, or receiving a conviction


for, a felony crime that substantially relates to the practice of


massage therapy and poses a reasonable threat to public safety.


B. To assist in determining the entry-level competence of an


applicant who makes application for a license after May 1, 2017, the


Board may adopt rules establishing additional standards or criteria

Req. No. 22 Page 12


for examination acceptance and may adopt only those examinations


that meet the standards outlined in Section 4200.8 of this title.


C. 1. After May 1, 2017, except Except as otherwise provided


in the Massage Therapy Practice Act, every person desiring to


practice massage therapy in this state shall be required to first


obtain a license from the Board.


2. After May 1, 2017, the Board may issue a license to an


applicant who:


a. is at least eighteen (18) years of age,


b. provides documentation that the applicant has


completed the equivalent of five hundred (500) hours


of formal education in massage therapy from a state-


licensed school,


c. provides documentation that the applicant has passed a


nationally recognized competency examination approved


by the Board,


d. provides proof that the applicant currently maintains


liability insurance for practice as a massage


therapist, and


e. provides full disclosure to the Board of any criminal


proceeding taken against the applicant including


pleading guilty or nolo contendere to, or receiving a


conviction for, a felony crime that substantially



Req. No. 22 Page 13


relates to the practice of massage therapy and poses a


reasonable threat to public safety.


D. In addition to an applicant’s failure to meet any other


requirements imposed by this section or other applicable law, the


Board may deny a license or impose probationary conditions if an


applicant has:


1. Pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to, received a deferred


sentence for, or been convicted of a felony crime that substantially


relates to the practice of massage therapy and poses a reasonable


threat to public safety;


2. Been the subject of disciplinary action by the Board; or


3. Been the subject of disciplinary action in another


jurisdiction.


E. As used in this section:


1. “Substantially relates” means the nature of criminal conduct


for which the person was convicted has a direct bearing on the


fitness or ability to perform one or more of the duties or


responsibilities necessarily related to the occupation; and


2. “Poses a reasonable threat” means the nature of criminal


conduct for which the person was convicted involved an act or threat


of harm against another and has a bearing on the fitness or ability


to serve the public or work with others in the occupation.





Req. No. 22 Page 14


SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4200.5a of Title 59, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. 1. Beginning January 1, 2026, any massage therapist wishing


to provide massage therapy services at a massage therapy


establishment shall first obtain a massage therapy establishment


license from the Board of Chiropractic Examiners as provided by this


section.


2. It shall be unlawful to operate a massage therapy


establishment without a massage therapy establishment license issued


by the Board; provided, however, a massage therapy establishment


currently in operation that makes application to the Board for a


massage therapy establishment license no later than January 1, 2026,


may continue to operate lawfully without such license until the


Board approves or denies the application.


B. 1. To obtain a massage therapy establishment license, a


massage therapist shall make application to the Board on a form


prescribed by the Board and shall pay a nonrefundable application


fee of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) to the Board. Massage therapy


establishment licenses shall be renewed biennially.


2. If there are multiple massage therapists working at a single


massage therapy establishment, the establishment shall designate one


massage therapist to be responsible for ensuring the establishment


complies with the requirements of the Massage Therapy Practice Act

Req. No. 22 Page 15


and any rules promulgated by the Board applicable to massage therapy


establishments. It shall be the duty of such designated massage


therapist to notify the Board of any changes to the massage therapy


establishment’s physical address or other application information.


C. Subject to the Administrative Procedures Act, the Board may


deny, refuse to renew, revoke, suspend, or take other appropriate


action against a massage therapy establishment license if the Board


finds that the massage therapy establishment, or a massage therapist


providing massage therapy services at the massage therapy


establishment, does not meet licensure qualifications prescribed by


the Board or is otherwise in violation of the Massage Therapy


Practice Act or rules promulgated by the Board.


D. The Board or designee may enter any massage therapy


establishment for the purpose of inspection on a routine basis or


when a complaint has been filed with the Board regarding the


practice of massage therapy at that establishment. A fee shall not


be charged for any inspection under this subsection.


E. The Board may promulgate rules governing massage therapy


establishments including, but not limited to, rules pertaining to


licensure qualifications, minimum standards, sanitation


requirements, recordkeeping requirements, inspections, and


disciplinary action.


SECTION 7. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 4200.6, is


amended to read as follows:

Req. No. 22 Page 16


Section 4200.6. A. A massage therapy license issued by the


State Board of Cosmetology and Barbering Board of Chiropractic


Examiners shall at all times be posted in a conspicuous place in the


massage therapy establishment or other principal place of business


of the holder.


B. A license issued pursuant to the Massage Therapy Practice


Act is not assignable or transferable.


SECTION 8. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 4200.8, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 4200.8. The required examination approved by the State


Board of Cosmetology and Barbering Board of Chiropractic Examiners


for licensure under the Massage Therapy Practice Act shall be a


standardized national massage therapy examination that meets the


following criteria:


1. Is statistically validated through a job analysis under


current standards for educational and professional testing;


2. Complies with pertinent state and federal equal employment


opportunity guidelines;


3. Is available to all potential licensing candidates; and


4. Is delivered through a professional testing company with


high-security test centers located nationwide.


SECTION 9. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 4200.9, is


amended to read as follows:



Req. No. 22 Page 17


Section 4200.9. A. The State Board of Cosmetology and


Barbering Board of Chiropractic Examiners may license an applicant,


provided that the applicant possesses a valid license or


registration to practice massage therapy issued by the appropriate


examining board under the laws of any other state or territory of


the United States, the District of Columbia or any foreign nation


and has met educational and examination requirements equal to or


exceeding those established pursuant to the Massage Therapy Practice


Act.


B. 1. Massage therapy licenses shall expire biennially.


Expiration dates shall be established by the Board through adoption


of a rule.


2. A license shall be renewed by submitting a renewal


application on a form provided by to the Board in the manner


prescribed by the Board.


3. A thirty-day grace period shall be allowed each license


holder after the end of the renewal period, during which time a


license may be renewed upon payment of the renewal fee and a late


fee as prescribed by the Board.


C. 1. If a massage therapy license is not renewed by the end


of the thirty-day grace period, the license shall be placed on


inactive status for a period not to exceed one (1) year. At the end


of one (1) year, if the license has not been reactivated, it shall


automatically expire.

Req. No. 22 Page 18


2. If within a period of one (1) year from the date the license


was placed on inactive status the massage therapist wishes to resume


practice, the massage therapist shall notify the Board in writing


and, upon receipt of proof of completion of all continuing education


requirements and payment of an amount set by the Board in lieu of


all lapsed renewal fees, the license shall be restored in full.


D. The Board shall establish a schedule of reasonable and


necessary administrative fees.


E. The Board shall fix the amount of fees so that the total


fees collected shall be sufficient to meet the expenses of


administering the provisions of the Massage Therapy Practice Act


without unnecessary surpluses.


SECTION 10. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 4200.11, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 4200.11. A. The State Board of Cosmetology and


Barbering Board of Chiropractic Examiners may take disciplinary


action against a person licensed pursuant to the Massage Therapy


Practice Act as follows:


1. Deny or refuse to renew a license;


2. Suspend or revoke a license;


3. Issue an administrative reprimand; or


4. Impose probationary conditions when the licensee or


applicant has engaged in unprofessional conduct that has endangered



Req. No. 22 Page 19


or is likely to endanger the health, welfare or safety of the


public.


B. The Board shall take disciplinary action upon a finding that


the licensee or person has committed an act of unprofessional


conduct or committed a violation of rule or law.


C. 1. Disciplinary proceedings may be instituted by sworn


complaint of any person, including members of the Board, and shall


conform to the provisions of the Administrative Procedures Act.


After an initial complaint is received by the Board, the Executive


Director of the Board and the chair of the Advisory Committee on


Massage Therapy, or designee, shall determine whether the complaint


merits further investigation. If a determination is made that the


complaint merits further investigation, the Executive Director, in


consultation with the chair of the Advisory Committee, or designee,


shall assign the complaint to an investigator. The focus and scope


of an investigation shall pertain only to the subject of the


complaint.


2. The complaint and findings of the investigator shall be


presented to the Advisory Committee for review. The Advisory


Committee, in consultation with the Board’s prosecuting attorney,


shall make an informal recommendation for disposition of the


complaint to the Board.


D. 1. The Board, its employees, appointed Advisory Committee


members, independent contractors, or other agents of the Board shall

Req. No. 22 Page 20


keep confidential the complaint and information obtained during an


investigation into violations of the Massage Therapy Practice Act;


provided, however, such information may be introduced by the state


in administrative proceedings before the Board and the information


then becomes a public record.


2. The complaint and information obtained during the


investigation but not introduced in administrative proceedings shall


not be subject to subpoena or discovery in any civil or criminal


proceedings, except that the Board may give such information to law


enforcement and other state agencies as necessary and appropriate in


the discharge of the duties of that agency and only under


circumstances that ensure against unauthorized access to the


information.


3. The respondent may acquire information obtained during an


investigation, unless the disclosure of the information is otherwise


prohibited, except for the investigative report, if the respondent


signs a protective order whereby the respondent agrees to use the


information solely for the purpose of defense in the Board


proceeding and in any appeal therefrom and agrees not to otherwise


disclose the information.


D. E. The Board shall establish the guidelines for the


disposition of disciplinary cases. Guidelines may include, but


shall not be limited to, periods of probation, conditions of


probation, suspension, revocation or reissuance of a license.

Req. No. 22 Page 21


E. F. A license holder who has been found culpable and


sanctioned by the Board shall be responsible for the payment of all


costs of the disciplinary proceedings and any administrative fees


imposed.


F. G. The forfeiture, nonrenewal, surrender, or voluntary


relinquishment of a license by a licensee shall not deprive the


Board of jurisdiction to proceed with disciplinary action any


investigation, action, or proceeding to revoke, suspend, condition,


or limit the licensee’s license or fine the licensee.


SECTION 11. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 4200.12, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 4200.12. A. No member or employee of the State Board


of Cosmetology and Barbering Board of Chiropractic Examiners shall


bear liability or be subject to civil damages or criminal


prosecution for any action undertaken or performed within the scope


of duty imposed pursuant to the Massage Therapy Practice Act.


B. No person or legal entity providing truthful and accurate


information to the Board, whether as a report, a complaint or


testimony, shall be subject to civil damages or criminal


prosecutions.


SECTION 12. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 4200.13, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 4200.13. A. A person who does any of the following


shall be guilty of a misdemeanor upon conviction:

Req. No. 22 Page 22


1. Violates a provision of the Massage Therapy Practice Act or


rules adopted pursuant to the Massage Therapy Practice Act;


2. Renders or attempts to render massage therapy services or


massage therapy instruction without the required current valid


license issued by the State Board of Cosmetology and Barbering Board


of Chiropractic Examiners;


3. Advertises or uses a designation, diploma or certificate


implying that the person offers massage therapy instruction or is a


massage therapy school unless the person holds a current valid


license issued by the Oklahoma Board of Private Vocational Schools


or is a technology center school accredited by the Oklahoma State


Board of Career and Technology Education; or


4. Advertises or uses a designation, diploma, or certificate


implying that the person is a massage therapist unless the person


holds a current valid license issued by the State Board of


Cosmetology and Barbering Board of Chiropractic Examiners.


B. 1. Therapists regulated by the Massage Therapy Practice Act


shall be designated as “massage therapists” and entitled to utilize


the term “massage” when advertising or printing promotional


material.


2. Any person who uses a professional title regulated by the


Massage Therapy Practice Act who is not authorized to use the


professional title shall be subject to disciplinary action by the


Board.

Req. No. 22 Page 23


3. Any person who knowingly aids and abets one or more persons


not authorized to use a professional title regulated by the Massage


Therapy Practice Act or knowingly employs or contracts with a person


or persons not authorized to use a regulated professional title in


the course of the employment, shall also be subject to disciplinary


action by the Board. It shall be a violation of the Massage Therapy


Practice Act for any person to advertise massage therapy services in


any combination with any escort or dating service.


SECTION 13. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-22 DC 1/19/2025 5:38:26 AM



























Req. No. 22 Page 24